Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 1 General Provisions [Renumbered]

§ 19-1-101.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

19-7-204

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-1-102.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-8-103

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-1-103.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-11-202

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-1-104.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-11-203

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-1-105.
[Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-8-105

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-1-106.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-8-104

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-1-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1953, ch. 138, § 1, related to the sale of certain lands.

§ 19-1-108.
[Amended and renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-7-201

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.